Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1013
Agencies owning vehicles paid for other than from General Fund; transfer title to transportation services bureau; reimbursement by credit against future charges.

On May 23, 1981, all state agencies owning vehicles used primarily for transportation of persons which were paid for wholly or partially by funds other than the General Fund shall transfer title to such vehicles to the transportation services bureau. The transportation services bureau shall compute the value of such vehicles at the time of transfer and give credit to the appropriate agency and program for the portion of such value based on the percentage of original purchase cost charged to appropriations other than from the General Fund. To get such credit each agency shall make available the appropriate accounting data. Such credit shall be applied against future daily, weekly, or monthly charges but not against future mileage charges.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 6, p. 2920;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 13.